Hawaii statutes.
§11-119 Printing; quantity. (a) The
ballots shall be printed by order of the chief election officer or the clerk in
the case of county elections. In any state or county election the chief
election officer on agreement with the clerk may consolidate the printing
contracts for similar types of ballots where such consolidation will result in
lower costs.

(b) Whenever the chief election officer is
responsible for the printing of ballots, unless provided otherwise, the exact
wording to appear thereon, including questions and issues shall be submitted to
the chief election officer not later than 4:30 p.m. on the seventy-fifth
calendar day prior to the applicable election.

(c) Based upon clarity and available space,
the chief election officer or the clerk in the case of county elections shall
determine the style and size of type to be used in printing the ballots. The
color, size, weight, shape, and thickness of the ballot shall be determined by
the chief election officer.

(d) Each precinct shall receive a sufficient
number of ballots based on the number of registered voters and the expected
spoilage in the election concerned. A sufficient number of absentee ballots
shall be delivered to each clerk not later than 4:30 p.m. on the fifteenth day
prior to the date of any election. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2; am L 1973, c 217,
§1(kk); am L 1975, c 36, §1(6); am L 1976, c 106, §1(9); am L 1979, c 133, §4;
am L 1980, c 264, §1(i); am L 1985, c 203, §4; am L 2011, c 143, §4]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next